fi: Uintipotkulaudan ominaisuudet: Kaksi kädensijaa; Ergonominen ote; Taitettava; Hydrodynaaminen profiili; Puhallettava; Useita kädensijoja; Liukumaton pinta; Rei'itetty rakenne; Sivuurat/sormiurat; Painotettu; Muu
pt-PT: Características da prancha de natação: Orifícios para as mãos duplos; Pega ergonómica; Dobrável; Perfil hidrodinâmico; Insuflável; Vários orifícios para as mãos; Superfície antiderrapante; Design perfurado; Reentrâncias laterais/ranhuras para os dedos; Com pesos; Outro
ja: キックボード機能: デュアルハンドホール; エルゴノミクスグリップ; 折りたたみ式; 流体力学プロファイル; 空気注入式; 複数のハンドホール; 滑り止め表面; 穴あきデザイン; サイドスカロップ/フィンガーグルーブ; ウェイト付き; その他
zh-CN: 踢板功能特性: 双手抓孔; 人体工学抓握; 可折叠; 流体动力学外形; 充气式; 多手抓孔; 防滑表面; 穿孔设计; 侧边扇形槽/手指槽; 加重; 其他
de: Merkmale des Kickboards: Zwei Grifflöcher; Ergonomischer Griff; Faltbar; Hydrodynamisches Profil; Aufblasbar; Mehrere Grifflöcher; Rutschfeste Oberfläche; Perforiertes Design; Seitliche Aussparungen/Fingermulden; Beschwert; Sonstige
pt-BR: Prancha de natação recursos: Furos duplos para mãos; Pegada ergonômica; Dobrável; Perfil hidrodinâmico; Inflável; Vários furos para mãos; Superfície antiderrapante; Design perfurado; Recortes laterais/ranhuras para os dedos; Com peso; Outros
cs: Vlastnosti kickboardu: Dva otvory pro ruce; Ergonomický úchop; Skládací; Hydrodynamický profil; Nafukovací; Více otvorů pro ruce; Protiskluzový povrch; Perforovaný design; Boční výřezy / drážky na prsty; Zátěžové; Jiné
lt-LT: Mokymosi plaukti lentos ypatybės: Dvi skylės rankoms; Ergonomiškas sukibimas; Sulankstoma; Hidrodinaminis profilis; Pripučiama; Keleto skylių rankoms; Neslystantis paviršius; Perforuotas dizainas; Šoninės išpjovos / grioveliai pirštams; Pasunkinta; Kita
hr-HR: Značajke daske za kickboard: Dvostruke rupe za ruke; Ergonomski rukohvat; Sklopivo; Hidrodinamički profil; Na napuhavanje; Više rupa za ruke; Protuklizna površina; Perforirani dizajn; Bočna udubljenja / utori za prste; Otežano; Ostalo
pl: Cechy deski do nauki pływania: Dwa otwory na dłonie; Ergonomiczny uchwyt; Składana; Profil hydrodynamiczny; Dmuchana; Wiele otworów na dłonie; Powierzchnia antypoślizgowa; Perforowana konstrukcja; Boczne wycięcia/rowki na palce; Z obciążeniem; Inne
it: Caratteristiche del kickboard: Doppi fori per le mani; Impugnatura ergonomica; Pieghevole; Profilo idrodinamico; Gonfiabile; Fori per le mani multipli; Superficie antiscivolo; Design traforato; Smerlature laterali/scanalature per le dita; Zavorrato; Altro
fr: Caractéristiques de la planche de natation: Double trou pour les mains; Prise ergonomique; Pliable; Profil hydrodynamique; Gonflable; Multiples trous pour les mains; Surface antidérapante; Design perforé; Bords festonnés/rainures pour les doigts; Lesté; Autre
sv: Egenskaper för simbräda: Dubbla handtagshål; Ergonomiskt grepp; Hopfällbar; Hydrodynamisk profil; Uppblåsbar; Flera handtagshål; Halkfri yta; Perforerad design; Utskärningar på sidan / fingerspår; Tyngd; Övrigt
hu: Úszódeszka jellemzői: Kettős kézlyuk; Ergonomikus markolat; Összehajtható; Hidrodinamikus profil; Felfújható; Több kézlyuk; Csúszásmentes felület; Perforált kialakítás; Oldalsó mélyedések/ujjbarázdák; Súlyozott; Egyéb
el: Χαρακτηριστικά σανίδας κολύμβησης (kickboard): Διπλές οπές χεριών; Εργονομική λαβή; Αναδιπλούμενο; Υδροδυναμικό προφίλ; Φουσκωτό; Πολλαπλές οπές χεριών; Αντιολισθητική επιφάνεια; Διάτρητος σχεδιασμός; Πλευρικές καμπύλες/αυλακώσεις δακτύλων; Με επιπλέον βάρος; Άλλο
zh-TW: 踢水板功能: 雙手把孔; 人體工學握把; 可摺疊; 流體力學外型; 充氣式; 多手把孔; 防滑表面; 穿孔設計; 側面波浪紋/手指凹槽; 加重; 其他
ko: 킥보드 기능: 이중 핸드홀; 인체공학적 그립; 접이식; 유체역학적 프로파일; 공기 주입식; 다중 핸드홀; 미끄럼 방지 표면; 타공 디자인; 측면 스캘럽/손가락 홈; 웨이트형; 기타
vi: Các tính năng của phao tập bơi: Hai lỗ nắm tay; Tay cầm công thái học; Có thể gấp gọn; Hình dạng thủy động lực học; Bơm hơi; Nhiều lỗ nắm tay; Bề mặt chống trượt; Thiết kế đục lỗ; Mép gợn sóng/rãnh đặt ngón tay ở cạnh; Gắn thêm tạ; Khác
en: Kickboard features: Dual hand holes; Ergonomic grip; Foldable; Hydrodynamic profile; Inflatable; Multiple hand holes; Non-slip surface; Perforated design; Side scallops/finger grooves; Weighted; Other
th: คุณสมบัติของบอร์ดเตะ: ช่องจับสองมือ; ด้ามจับออกแบบตามหลักสรีรศาสตร์; พับได้; ทรงไฮโดรไดนามิก; แบบเป่าลม; ช่องจับหลายช่อง; พื้นผิวกันลื่น; ดีไซน์เจาะรู; ร่องด้านข้าง/ร่องวางนิ้ว; ถ่วงน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Lastnosti plavalne deske: Dve odprtini za roke; Ergonomski ročaj; Zložljivo; Hidrodinamični profil; Napihljivo; Več odprtin za roke; Nedrseča površina; Luknjičast dizajn; Stranske vdolbine/utori za prste; Obteženo; Drugo
nb: Funksjoner for sparkebrett: Doble håndhull; Ergonomisk grep; Sammenleggbar; Hydrodynamisk profil; Oppblåsbar; Flere håndhull; Sklisikker overflate; Perforert design; Sideinnsnitt/fingerspor; Vektet; Annet
es: Características de la tabla de natación: Dos agujeros para las manos; Agarre ergonómico; Plegable; Perfil hidrodinámico; Inflable; Múltiples agujeros para las manos; Superficie antideslizante; Diseño perforado; Bordes festoneados/ranuras para los dedos; Con peso; Otra
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale plutei de înot (kickboardului): Două orificii pentru mâini; Prindere ergonomică; Pliabil; Profil hidrodinamic; Gonflabil; Mai multe orificii pentru mâini; Suprafață antiderapantă; Design perforat; Decupaje laterale/caneluri pentru degete; Cu greutăți; Altele
bg-BG: Характеристики на дъската за оттласкване: Двойни отвори за ръце; Ергономичен захват; Сгъваема; Хидродинамичен профил; Надуваема; Множество отвори за ръце; Неплъзгаща се повърхност; Перфориран дизайн; Странични извивки/канали за пръстите; Отежнена; Друго
nl: Kickboard functies: Dubbele handgaten; Ergonomische grip; Opvouwbaar; Hydrodynamisch profiel; Opblaasbaar; Meerdere handgaten; Antislip-oppervlak; Geperforeerd ontwerp; Zij-uitsparingen/vingergroeven; Verzwaard; Anders
da: Kickboard-funktioner: Dobbelte håndhuller; Ergonomisk greb; Sammenfoldelig; Hydrodynamisk profil; Oppustelig; Flere håndhuller; Skridsikker overflade; Perforeret design; Sideudskæringer/fingerriller; Vægtet; Andet
ru: Характеристики доски для плавания: Два отверстия для рук; Эргономичный хват; Складная; Гидродинамический профиль; Надувная; Несколько отверстий для рук; Нескользящая поверхность; Перфорированный дизайн; Боковые вырезы/углубления для пальцев; Утяжеленная; Другое
sk-SK: Funkcie kickboardu: Dva otvory na ruky; Ergonomický úchop; Skladacie; Hydrodynamický profil; Nafukovacie; Viac otvorov na ruky; Protišmykový povrch; Perforovaný dizajn; Bočné výrezy/drážky na prsty; Záťažové; Iné
tr: Kickboard özellikleri: Çift el deliği; Ergonomik tutma yeri; Katlanabilir; Hidrodinamik profil; Şişirilebilir; Çoklu el deliği; Kaymaz yüzey; Delikli tasarım; Yan oyuklar/parmak olukları; Ağırlıklı; Diğer